Mississippi, session 2026, HB1312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Purple Angels Law." SECTION 2. The following words shall have the meanings described herein as follows: (a) "Convicted" or "conviction" means a verdict of guilty by a judge or jury or a plea of guilty, including a plea of nolo contendere or a best interest plea accepted by the court. (b)  "Domestic abuse victim" means a person who qualifies as a domestic abuse victim under Section 93-21-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, or any successor provision. (c)  "Persistent domestic violence offender means a person who: (i)  Has been convicted in this state of an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim; and (ii)  Has at least one (1) prior conviction for an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim. (d)  "Prior conviction" means a conviction that occurred before the current qualifying offense, regardless of whether the conviction occurred in this state or another jurisdiction, provided the offense would constitute an offense against a domestic abuse victim under Mississippi law. (e) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Public Safety. SECTION 3. (1)  The Mississippi Department of Public Safety shall create a registry of persistent domestic violence offenders. (2)  The Department shall maintain the registry using information provided by clerks of court pursuant to this chapter and information available from the Mississippi Department of Corrections and local law enforcement agencies. (3)  The Department shall make the registry available for public on the Internet. SECTION 4. (1)  The public registry shall include the following information for each persistent domestic violence offender: (a)  Name; (b)  Date of birth; (c)  Date of conviction; (d)  County or counties of conviction; and (e)  A current photograph. (2)  When available after reasonable inquiry, the clerk of court shall provide the department with a copy of the offender's driver's license or other state or federal identification and any additional identifying data the department determines is necessary to accurately identify the offender and exclude innocent persons. (3)  The registry made available for public inquiry shall not include the offender's Social Security number, driver's license number, or any other state or federal identification number. SECTION 5. (1)  If a person is convicted of an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim and has at least one (1) prior conviction for an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim, the court shall, upon proof of the prior conviction, order the defendant to register as a persistent domestic violence offender under this act. (2)  When a court orders registration under this act, the clerk of court shall forward to the department a certified copy of the qualifying conviction and the defendant's date of birth within seven (7) days of the date of conviction. SECTION 6. (1)  In addition to any other penalty imposed by law, a defendant required to register under this act shall be assessed a registration fee of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00). (2)  The fee shall be paid to the clerk of the court imposing the sentence, who shall: (a)  Retain Fifty Dollars ($50.00) of the fee for administrative costs associated with processing and transmitting registration information under this chapter; (b)  Transmit Fifty Dollars ($50.00) of the fee to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety to be retained by the department for administrative costs associated with the establishment, maintenance, and enforcement of the registry and implementation of this act; and (c)  Remit the remaining One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety for deposit into the Domestic Violence Fund, to be used exclusively for domestic violence prevention, intervention, and victim support services. (2)  Funds remitted under this section shall not revert to the State General Fund at the end of the fiscal year and shall be carried forward for the purposes authorized in this section. SECTION 7. The department shall remove the name and identifying information of a persistent domestic violence offender from the registry,as follows: (a)  Five (5) years after the date of the most recent conviction if the offender has one (1) prior conviction; (b)  Seven (7) years after the date of the most recent conviction if the offender has two (2) prior convictions; (c)  Ten (10) years after the date of the most recent conviction if the offender has three (3) prior convictions; (d)  Twenty (20) years after the date of the most recent conviction if the offender has four (4) or more prior convictions; or (e)  Lifetime if the offender has been convicted of a felony against a domestic violence victim. SECTION 8. This act applies only to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2026; however, prior convictions used to establish eligibility for registration are not required to have occurred on or after that date. SECTION 9.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.